Maryland, session 2026, HB0941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
SUBTITLE 10. HYGIENE PRODUCTS.
2–1001.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0941*

HOUSE BILL 941
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “MENSTRUAL HYGIENE PRODUCTS” MEANS APPROPRIATELY SIZED
TAMPONS, SANITARY NAPKINS, AND SANITARY PADS FOR USE IN CONNECTION WITH
THE MENSTRUAL CYCLE.
(C) (1) “PUBLIC BUILDING” MEANS A BUILDING, A STRUCTURE, OR AN
IMPROVED AREA THAT IS OWNED, LEASED, OR OPERATED BY THE STATE OR A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
(2) “PUBLIC BUILDING” INCLUDES:
(I) A PUBLIC MASS TRANSPORTATION ACCOMMODATION, SUCH
AS A TERMINAL OR STATION, THAT IS SUPPORTED BY PUBLIC FUNDS; AND
(II) AN IMPROVEMENT OF A PUBLIC AREA USED FOR
GATHERING OR AMUSEMENT, INCLUDING A PUBLIC PARK OR RECREATION CENTER.
(3) “PUBLIC BUILDING” DOES NOT INCLUDE A FACILITY THAT IS
PRIMARILY USED TO PROVIDE PRIMARY OR SECONDARY EDUCATION.
(D) (1) “PUBLIC RESTROOM” MEANS A SANITARY FACILITY AVAILABLE
TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC THAT CONTAINS AT LEAST ONE TOILET OR URINAL.
(2) “PUBLIC RESTROOM” DOES NOT INCLUDE A SANITARY FACILITY
AVAILABLE TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC THAT CONTAINS ONLY A COMPOSTING TOILET
OR A PIT TOILET.
2–1002.
EACH PUBLIC RESTROOM IN EACH PUBLIC BUILDING SHALL PROVIDE AN
ADEQUATE SUPPLY OF:
(1) HAND SOAP;
(2) TOILET PAPER;
(3) TOWELS OR OTHER HAND DRYING DEVICES;
(4) WATER;
(5) WASTE CONTAINERS; AND

HOUSE BILL 941 3
(6) MENSTRUAL HYGIENE PRODUCTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.